Utah statutes.
78B-1-141.   Witnesses -- Discharge when unlawfully arrested.
The court or officer issuing the subpoena, and the court or officer before
whom the attendance is required, may discharge the witness from an arrest made
in violation of Section 78B-1-138.  If the court has adjourned before the
arrest or before application for the discharge, a judge of the court may grant
the discharge.
